Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2907.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-166, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-166. Verification of registration A. Except for the mailing of sample ballots, a county recorder who mails an item to any elector shall send the mailing by nonforwardable first class mail marked with the statement required by the postmaster to receive an address correction notification. If the item is returned undelivered, the county recorder shall send a follow-up notice to that elector within three weeks of receipt of the returned notice. The county recorder shall send the follow-up notice to the address that appears in the general county register or to the forwarding address provided by the United States postal service. The follow-up notice shall include an appropriate internet address for revising voter registration information or a registration form and the information prescribed by section 16-131, subsection C and shall state that if the elector does not complete and return a new registration form with current information to the county recorder or make changes to the elector's voter registration information that is maintained online within thirty-five days, the elector's registration status shall be changed from active to inactive. B. If the elector provides the county recorder with a new registration form or otherwise revises the elector's information, the county recorder shall change the general register to reflect the changes indicated on the new registration. If the elector indicates a new residence address outside that county, the county recorder shall forward the voter registration form or revised information to the county recorder of the county in which the elector's address is located.  If the elector provides a new residence address that is located outside this state, the county recorder shall cancel the elector's registration. C. The county recorder shall maintain on the inactive voter list the names of electors who have been removed from the general register pursuant to subsection A or E of this section for a period of four years or through the date of the second general election for federal office following the date of the notice from the county recorder that is sent pursuant to subsection E of this section. D. On notice that a government agency has changed the name of any street, route number, post office box number or other address designation, the county recorder shall revise the registration records and shall send a new verification of registration notice to the electors whose records were changed. E. The county recorder on or before May 1 of each year preceding a state primary and general election or more frequently as the recorder deems necessary may use the change of address information supplied by the postal service through its licensees and the information provided by an electronic voter registration information center to identify registrants whose addresses may have changed. If it appears from information provided by the postal service or an electronic voter registration information center that a registrant has moved to a different residence address, the county recorder shall send the registrant a notice of the change by forwardable mail and a postage prepaid preaddressed return form or an appropriate internet address for revising voter registration information by which the registrant may verify or correct the registration information. If the registrant fails to revise the information or return the form postmarked not later than thirty-five days after the mailing of the notice, the elector's registration status shall be changed from active to inactive. If the notice sent by the recorder is not returned, the registrant may be required to provide affirmation or confirmation of the registrant's address in order to vote.  If the registrant does not vote in an election during the period after the date of the notice from the recorder through the date of the second general election for federal office following the date of that notice, the registrant's name shall be removed from the list of inactive voters. If the registrant has changed residence to a new county, the county recorder shall provide information on how the registrant can continue to be eligible to vote. F. The county recorder shall reject any application for registration that is not accompanied by satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship.  Satisfactory evidence of citizenship shall include any of the following: 1. The number of the applicant's driver license or nonoperating identification license issued after October 1, 1996 by the department of transportation or the equivalent governmental agency of another state within the United States if the agency indicates on the applicant's driver license or nonoperating identification license that the person has provided satisfactory proof of United States citizenship. 2. A legible photocopy of the applicant's birth certificate that verifies citizenship to the satisfaction of the county recorder. 3. A legible photocopy of pertinent pages of the applicant's United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant's passport number or presentation to the county recorder of the applicant's United States passport. 4. A presentation to the county recorder of the applicant's United States naturalization documents or the number of the certificate of naturalization.  If only the number of the certificate of naturalization is provided, the applicant shall not be included in the registration rolls until the number of the certificate of naturalization is verified with the United States immigration and naturalization service by the county recorder. 5. Other documents or methods of proof that are established pursuant to the immigration reform and control act of 1986. 6. The applicant's bureau of Indian affairs card number, tribal treaty card number or tribal enrollment number. G. Notwithstanding subsection F of this section, any person who is registered in this state on the effective date of this amendment to this section is deemed to have provided satisfactory evidence of citizenship and shall not be required to resubmit evidence of citizenship unless the person is changing voter registration from one county to another. H. For the purposes of this section, proof of voter registration from another state or county is not satisfactory evidence of citizenship. I. A person who modifies voter registration records with a new residence ballot shall not be required to submit evidence of citizenship.  After citizenship has been demonstrated to the county recorder, the person is not required to resubmit satisfactory evidence of citizenship in that county. J. After a person has submitted satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the county recorder shall indicate this information in the person's permanent voter file.  After two years the county recorder may destroy all documents that were submitted as evidence of citizenship. K. The secretary of state shall join and maintain this state's participation in a multistate electronic voter registration information center in order to ensure accurate and timely voter registration information. the county recorder shall participate in list maintenance efforts in coordination with the secretary of state that are derived from this membership. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 16-245, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-245. Form and content of ballot A. Ballots and ballot labels for the presidential preference election shall be printed on different colored paper or white paper with a different colored stripe for each party represented on the presidential preference election ballot. Only one party may be represented on each ballot. At the top shall be printed "official ballot of the ______________ party, presidential preference election (date), county of _______, state of Arizona". B. The order of the names of certified candidates on the ballot shall be determined by lots drawn at a public meeting called by the secretary of state for that purpose. Rotation of candidate names is prohibited. The certified candidates shall be listed under the title "_______________ party candidates for President of the United States". Immediately below shall be printed "vote for not more than one". The ballot may also contain printed instructions to voters as prescribed for other elections. C. The officer in charge of elections shall provide a sample ballot proof to the state committee chairman of each qualified candidate's state committee no not later than five days after receipt of RECEIVING the certification from the secretary of state. D. The officer in charge of elections shall mail one sample ballot of each party represented on the presidential preference election ballot to each household that contains a registered voter of that political party unless that registered voter is on the active permanent early voting list established pursuant to section 16-544. The return address on the sample ballot mailer shall not contain the name of any elected or appointed official, and the name of an appointed or elected official shall not be used to indicate who produced the sample ballot. E. The mailing face of each sample ballot shall be imprinted with the great seal of the state of Arizona with the words "official voting materials  presidential preference election". The polling place voting location for that household may also be designated on the mailing face of the sample ballot.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 16-246, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-246. Early balloting; satellite locations; additional procedures A. Within ninety-three days before the presidential preference election and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day preceding the election, any elector who is eligible to vote in the presidential preference election may make a verbal or signed, written request for an official early ballot to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections for the county in which the elector is registered to vote. If the request is verbal, the requesting elector shall provide the date of birth and birthplace or other information that if compared to the voter registration records for that elector would confirm the identity of the elector. B. Absent uniformed services voters or overseas voters who are otherwise eligible to vote in the election may vote as prescribed by sections 16-543 and 16-543.02. C. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may establish on-site early voting locations at the office of the county recorder or at other locations in the county deemed necessary or appropriate by the recorder. Early voting shall begin within the time limits prescribed in section 16-542 unless otherwise prescribed by this section. D. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall send by nonforwardable mail that is marked with the statement required by the postmaster to receive an address correction notification any early ballots that are requested pursuant to subsections A and B of this section and shall include a preaddressed envelope for the elector to return the completed ballot. E. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide to each election board an appropriate alphabetized list of voters who have requested and have been sent an early ballot. Any person who is on that list of voters and who was sent an early ballot shall not vote at the polling place voting location for that election precinct except as prescribed by section 16-579, subsection B. F. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may provide for any of the following special election boards in the same manner prescribed by law for other elections. : 1. Special election boards. 2. Emergency balloting for persons who experience an emergency after 5:00 p.m. on the Friday preceding the presidential preference election and before 5:00 p.m. on the Monday immediately preceding the presidential preference election. Before receiving a ballot pursuant to this paragraph, a person who experiences an emergency shall provide identification as prescribed in section 16-579 and shall sign a statement under penalty of perjury that states that the person is experiencing or experienced an emergency after 5:00 p.m. on the Friday immediately preceding the election and before 5:00 p.m. on the Monday immediately preceding the election that would prevent the person from voting at the polls. Signed statements received pursuant to this subsection are not subject to inspection pursuant to title 39, chapter 1, article 2. G. Notwithstanding section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 2, for emergency balloting pursuant to subsection F, paragraph 2 of this section, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may allow a qualified elector to update the elector's voter registration information as provided for in the secretary of state's instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452. H. g. Sections 16-550, 16-551 and 16-552 govern the use of early balloting for the presidential preference election. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Repeal Section 16-407.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 5. Title 16, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-407.04, to read: START_STATUTE16-407.04. Election administration; private monies Notwithstanding any other law, the secretary of state, county recorders and county election directors may receive and spend private monies for improvements to PROCESSES used in preparing for, administering or conducting elections, including registering voters, conducting voter education and DEVELOPING INNOVATIVE election programs. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 16-411, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-411. Designation of election precincts; voting centers; electioneering; wait times A. The board of supervisors of each county, on or before October 1 of each year preceding the year of a general election, by an order, shall establish a convenient number of election precincts in the county and define the boundaries of the precincts as follows: 1. The election precinct boundaries shall be established so as to be included within election districts prescribed by law for elected officers of the state and its political subdivisions, including community college district precincts, except those elected officers provided for in titles 30 and 48. 2. If after October 1 of the year preceding the year of a general election the board of supervisors must further adjust precinct boundaries due to the redistricting of election districts as prescribed by law and to comply with this subsection, the board of supervisors shall adjust these precinct boundaries as soon as is practicable. B. At least twenty days before a general or primary election, and at least ten days before a special election, the board shall designate one polling place within each precinct where the election shall be held, except that: 1. On a specific finding of the board, included in the order or resolution designating polling places pursuant to this subsection, that no suitable polling place is available within a precinct, a polling place for that precinct may be designated within an adjacent precinct. 2. Adjacent precincts may be combined if boundaries so established are included in election districts prescribed by law for state elected officials and political subdivisions including community college districts but not including elected officials prescribed by titles 30 and 48. The officer in charge of elections may also split a precinct for administrative purposes.  The polling places shall be listed in separate sections of the order or resolution. 3. On a specific finding of the board that the number of persons who are listed as early voters pursuant to section 16-544 and who are not expected to have their ballots tabulated at the polling place as prescribed in section 16-579.02 is likely to substantially reduce the number of voters appearing at one or more specific polling places at that election, adjacent precincts may be consolidated by combining polling places and precinct boards for that election. The board of supervisors shall ensure that a reasonable and adequate number of polling places will be designated for that election.  Any consolidated polling places shall be listed in separate sections of the order or resolution of the board. 4. on a specific resolution of the board, the board may authorize shall provide for the use of voting centers in place of or in addition to specifically designated polling places voting locations. A voting center shall allow any voter in that county to receive the appropriate ballot for that voter on election day after presenting identification as prescribed in section 16-579 and to lawfully cast the ballot. Voting centers may shall be established in coordination and consultation with the county recorder, at other county offices or at other locations in the county deemed appropriate. 5. On a specific resolution of the board of supervisors that is limited to a specific election date and that is voted on by a recorded vote, the board may authorize the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections to use emergency voting centers as follows: (a) The board shall specify in the resolution the location and the hours of operation of the emergency voting centers. (b) A qualified elector voting at an emergency voting center shall provide identification as prescribed in section 16-579, except that notwithstanding section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 2, for any voting at an emergency voting center, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may allow a qualified elector to update the elector's voter registration information as provided for in the secretary of state's instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452. (c) If an emergency voting center established pursuant to this section becomes unavailable and there is not sufficient time for the board of supervisors to convene to approve an alternate location for that emergency voting center, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may make changes to the approved emergency voting center location and shall notify the public and the board of supervisors regarding that change as soon as practicable. The alternate emergency voting center shall be as close in proximity to the approved emergency voting center location as possible. C. If the board fails to designate the place for holding the election, or if it cannot be held at or about the place designated, the justice of the peace in the precinct, two days before the election, by an order, copies of which the justice of the peace shall immediately post in three public places in the precinct, shall designate the place within the precinct for holding the election. If there is no justice of the peace in the precinct, or if the justice of the peace fails to do so, the election board of the precinct shall designate and give notice of the place within the precinct of holding the election. For any election in which there are no candidates for elected office appearing on the ballot, the board may consolidate polling places and precinct boards and may consolidate the tabulation of results for that election if all of the following apply: 1. All affected voters are notified by mail of the change at least thirty-three days before the election. 2. Notice of the change in polling places includes notice of the new voting location, notice of the hours for voting on election day and notice of the telephone number to call for voter assistance. 3. All affected voters receive information on early voting that includes the application used to request an early voting ballot. D. C. The board is not required to designate a polling place voting center for special district mail ballot elections held pursuant to article 8.1 of this chapter, but the board may designate one or more sites for voters to deposit marked ballots until 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election. E. D. Except as provided in subsection F  e of this section, a public school shall provide sufficient space for use as a polling place voting location for any city, county or state election when requested by the officer in charge of elections. F. E. The principal of the school may deny a request to provide space for use as a polling place voting location for any city, county or state election if, within two weeks after a request has been made, the principal provides a written statement indicating a reason the election cannot be held in the school, including any of the following: 1. Space is not available at the school. 2. The safety or welfare of the children would be jeopardized. G. F. Beginning in 2026, the department of administration shall coordinate with state agencies and counties to provide available and appropriate state-owned facilities for use as a voting location for any city, county or state election when requested by the officer in charge of elections. H. G. The board shall make available to the public as a public record a list of the polling places voting locations for all precincts in which the election is to be held. I. H. Except in the case of an emergency, any facility that is used as a polling place voting location on election day or that is used as an early voting site during the period of early voting shall allow persons to electioneer and engage in other political activity outside of the seventy-five foot limit prescribed by section 16-515 in public areas and parking lots used by voters. This subsection does not allow the temporary or permanent construction of structures in public areas and parking lots or the blocking or other impairment of access to parking spaces for voters.  The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall post on its website at least two weeks before election day a list of those polling places voting locations in which emergency conditions prevent electioneering and shall specify the reason the emergency designation was granted and the number of attempts that were made to find a polling place voting location before granting an emergency designation. If the polling place voting location is not on the website list of polling places voting locations with emergency designations, electioneering and other political activity shall be allowed outside of the seventy-five foot limit. If an emergency arises after the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections' initial website posting, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall update the website as soon as is practicable to include any new polling places voting location, shall highlight the polling place voting location on the website and shall specify the reason the emergency designation was granted and the number of attempts that were made to find a polling place voting location before granting an emergency designation. J. I. For the purposes of this section, a county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall designate a polling place voting location as an emergency polling place voting location and thus prohibit persons from electioneering and engaging in other political activity outside of the seventy-five foot limit prescribed by section 16-515 but inside the property of the facility that is hosting the polling place voting location if any of the following occurs: 1. An act of God renders a previously set polling place voting location as unusable. 2. A county recorder or other officer in charge of elections has exhausted all options and there are no suitable facilities in a precinct an area that are willing to be a polling place voting location unless a facility can be given an emergency designation. K. J. The secretary of state shall provide through the instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452 the maximum allowable wait time for any election that is subject to section 16-204 and provide for a method to reduce voter wait time at the polls in the primary and general elections. The method shall consider at least all of the following for primary and general elections in each precinct: 1. The number of ballots voted in the prior primary and general elections. 2. The number of registered voters who voted early in the prior primary and general elections. 3. The number of registered voters and the number of registered voters who cast an early ballot for the current primary or general election. 4. The number of registered voters whose early ballots were tabulated on-site as prescribed in section 16-579.02 in the prior primary and general elections. 5. The number of election board members and clerks and the number of rosters that will reduce voter wait time at the polls.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 16-461, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-461. Sample primary election ballots; submission to party chairmen for examination; preparation, printing and distribution of ballot A. At least forty-five days before a primary election, the officer in charge of that election shall: 1. Prepare a proof of a sample ballot. 2. Submit the sample ballot proof of each party to the county chairman or in city or town primaries to the city or town chairman. 3. Mail a sample ballot proof to each candidate for whom a nomination paper and petitions have been filed. B. Within two calendar days after receipt of the sample ballot, the county chairman of each political party and any candidate in that election who has submitted and confirmed an email address shall suggest to the election officer any change the chairman or candidate considers should be made in the chairman's or candidate's party ballot, and if on examination the election officer finds an error or omission on the ballot, the officer shall correct it.  The election officer shall print and distribute the sample ballots as required by law, shall maintain a copy of each sample ballot and shall post a notice indicating that sample ballots are available on request.  The official sample ballot shall be printed on colored paper or white paper with a different colored stripe for each party that is represented on that ballot. For voters who are not registered with a party that is entitled to continued representation on the ballot pursuant to section 16-804, the election officer may print and distribute the required sample ballots in an alternative format, including a reduced size format. C. Not later than forty days before a primary election, the county chairman of a political party may request one sample primary election ballot of the chairman's party for each election precinct. D. The board of supervisors shall have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a primary election and shall mail at least eleven days before the election one sample ballot of a political party to each household containing a registered voter of that political party unless that registered voter is on the active permanent early voting list established pursuant to section 16-544. Each sample ballot shall contain the following statement:  "This is a sample ballot and cannot be used as an official ballot under any circumstances". A certified claim shall be presented to the secretary of state by the board of supervisors for the actual cost of printing, labeling and postage of each sample ballot actually mailed, and the secretary of state shall direct payment of the authenticated claim from funds of the secretary of state's office. E. For city and town elections, the governing body of a city or town may have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a primary election.  If the city or town has printed such sample ballots, the city or town shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. F. The return address on the mailer-type sample ballots shall not contain the name of an appointed or elected public officer nor may the name of an appointed or elected public officer be used to indicate who produced the sample ballot. G. The great seal of the state of Arizona shall be imprinted along with the words "official voting materials" on the mailing face of each sample ballot. In county, city or town elections the seal of such jurisdiction shall be substituted for the state seal. END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 16-510, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-510. Sample ballots; preparation and distribution A. Before printing the sample ballots for the general election the board of supervisors shall send to each candidate whose name did not appear on the preceding primary election ballot and to the county chairperson of each political party a ballot proof of the sample ballot for the candidate's and chairperson's review.  Within two calendar days after receipt of the sample ballot, those candidates and the county chairperson of each political party shall suggest to the election officer any change the candidate or chairperson considers should be made to the ballot, and if on examination the election officer finds an error or omission on the ballot, the officer shall correct the error or omission. B. The board of supervisors shall print and distribute, for the information of voters at each polling place voting location, a number of sample ballots as it deems necessary. C. The board of supervisors shall have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a general election and shall mail at least eleven days before the election one such sample ballot to each household in the county containing a registered voter unless that registered voter is on the active permanent early voting list established pursuant to section 16-544.  Each sample ballot shall contain the following statement:  "This is a sample ballot and cannot be used as an official ballot under any circumstances". A certified claim shall be presented to the secretary of state by the board of supervisors for the actual cost of printing, labeling and postage of each sample ballot actually mailed, and the secretary of state shall direct payment of the authenticated claim from funds of the secretary of state's office. D. For city and town elections, the governing body of a city or town may have printed mailer-type sample ballots for a general election. If the city or town has printed such sample ballots, the city or town shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. E. For special district elections, the governing body of a special district may have printed mailer-type sample ballots. If the special district has printed such sample ballots, the special district shall provide for the distribution of such ballots and shall bear the expense of printing and distributing such sample ballots. END_STATUTE Sec. 9. Section 16-515, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-515. "Seventy-five foot limit" notices; posting; violation; classification A. Except as prescribed in this section and section 16-580, a person shall not be allowed to remain inside the seventy-five foot limit for each voting location while the polls are open and for each designated ballot receptacle while accessible to the public, except for the purpose of voting, and except the election officials, one representative at any one time of each political party represented on the ballot who has been appointed by the county chairman of that political party and the challengers allowed by law, and no electioneering may not occur within the seventy-five foot limit. Voters having cast their ballots shall promptly move outside the seventy-five foot limit. B. The board of supervisors shall furnish for each designated ballot receptacle, and with the ballots for each polling place voting location, three notices, printed in letters not less than two inches high, with the heading: "Seventy-five foot limit" and underneath that heading the following: No person shall be allowed to remain inside these limits while the polls are open, except for the purpose of voting, and except the election officials, one representative at any one time of each political party represented on the ballot who has been appointed by the county chairman of such political party, and the challengers allowed by law. Voters having cast their ballots shall at once retire without the seventy-five foot limit. A person violating any provision of this notice is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. C. A minor voting in a simulated election at a polling place voting location is subject to the same seventy-five foot limit restrictions prescribed for a voter. Persons supervising or working in a simulated election in which minors vote may remain within the seventy-five foot limit of the polling place voting location.  The inspector for the polling place voting location shall exercise authority over all election and simulated election related activities at the polling place voting location. D. For an election that is held by an Indian tribe and that is held at a polling place voting location at the same time and on the same date as any other election, the following apply: 1. A person who is voting is subject to the same seventy-five foot limit restrictions prescribed for other voters. 2. An election official for the tribal election may remain within the seventy-five foot limit for the polling place voting location. E. With the permission of the voter, a minor may enter and remain within the seventy-five foot limit in order to accompany a voter into a polling place voting location, an on-site early voting facility and a voting booth while the voter is voting. F. Notwithstanding any other law, an election official, a representative of a political party who has been appointed by the county chairman of that political party or a challenger who is authorized by law to be within the seventy-five foot limit as prescribed by this section shall not wear, carry or display materials that identify or express support for or opposition to a candidate, a political party or organization, a ballot question or any other political issue and shall not electioneer within the seventy-five foot limit of a polling place voting location or designated ballot receptacle. G. Notwithstanding section 16-1018, a person may not take photographs or videos while within the seventy-five foot limit. H. Any A person violating who violates this section is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor. I. For the purposes of this section, electioneering occurs when an individual knowingly, intentionally, by verbal expression and in order to induce or compel another person to vote in a particular manner or to refrain from voting expresses support for or opposition to a candidate who appears on the ballot in that election, a ballot question that appears on the ballot in that election or a political party with one or more candidates who appear on the ballot in that election. END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 16-542, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-542. Request for ballot; civil penalties; violation; classification A. Within ninety-three days before any election called pursuant to the laws of this state, an elector may make a verbal or signed request to the county recorder, or other officer in charge of elections for the applicable political subdivision of this state in whose jurisdiction the elector is registered to vote, for an official early ballot.  In addition to name and address, the requesting elector shall provide the date of birth and state or country of birth or other information that if compared to the voter registration information on file would confirm the identity of the elector. If the request indicates that the elector needs a primary election ballot and a general election ballot, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall honor the request.  For any partisan primary election, if the elector is not registered as a member of a political party that is entitled to continued representation on the ballot pursuant to section 16-804, the elector shall designate the ballot of only one of the political parties that is entitled to continued representation on the ballot and the elector may receive and vote the ballot of only that one political party, which also shall include any nonpartisan offices and ballot questions, or the elector shall designate the ballot for nonpartisan offices and ballot questions only and the elector may receive and vote the ballot that contains only nonpartisan offices and ballot questions. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall process any request for an early ballot for a municipal election pursuant to this subsection. The county recorder may shall establish on-site early voting locations at the county recorder's office, which shall be open and available for use beginning the same day that a county begins to send out the early ballots. The county recorder may also establish any other early voting locations in the county the county recorder deems necessary.  The early voting locations, including the locations at the county recorder's offices, shall be open on the Saturday,  Sunday and Monday before election day from at least 8:00 a.m. until at least 5:00 p.m.  Any on-site early voting location or other early voting location shall require each elector to present identification as prescribed in section 16-579 before receiving a ballot.  Notwithstanding section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 2, at any on-site early voting location or other early voting location the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may provide for a qualified elector to update the elector's voter registration information as provided for in the secretary of state's instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a request for an official early ballot from an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter as defined in the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act (P.L. 99-410; 52 United States Code section 20310) or a voter whose information is protected pursuant to section 16-153 that is received by the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections more than ninety-three days before the election is valid. If requested by the absent uniformed services or overseas voter, or a voter whose information is protected pursuant to section 16-153, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide to the requesting voter early ballot materials through the next regularly scheduled general election for federal office immediately following receipt of the request unless a different period of time, which does not exceed the next two regularly scheduled general elections for federal office, is designated by the voter. C. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall mail the early ballot and the envelope for its return postage prepaid to the address provided by the requesting elector within five days after receipt of the official early ballots from the officer charged by law with the duty of preparing ballots pursuant to section 16-545, except that early ballot distribution shall not begin more than twenty-seven days before the election. If an early ballot request is received on or before the thirty-first day before the election, the early ballot shall be distributed not earlier than the twenty-seventh day before the election and not later than the twenty-fourth day before the election. D. Only the elector may be in possession of that elector's unvoted early ballot. If a complete and correct request is made by the elector within twenty-seven days before the election, the mailing must be made within forty-eight hours after receipt of the request. Saturdays, Sundays and other legal holidays are excluded from the computation of the forty-eight-hour period prescribed by this subsection.  If a complete and correct request is made by an absent uniformed services voter or an overseas voter before the election, the regular early ballot shall be transmitted by mail, by fax or by other electronic format approved by the secretary of state within twenty-four hours after the early ballots are delivered pursuant to section 16-545, subsection B, excluding Sundays. E. In order to be complete and correct and to receive an early ballot by mail, an elector's request that an early ballot be mailed to the elector's residence or temporary address must include all of the information prescribed by subsection A of this section and must be received by the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections not later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day preceding the election. An elector who appears personally not later than 7:00 p.m. on the Friday preceding the election at an on-site early voting location that is established by the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall be given a ballot after presenting identification as prescribed in section 16-579 and shall be allowed to vote at the on-site location.  Notwithstanding section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 2, at any on-site early voting location the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may provide for a qualified elector to update the elector's voter registration information as provided for in the secretary of state's instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452. If an elector's request to receive an early ballot is not complete and correct but complies with all other requirements of this section, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall attempt to notify the elector of the deficiency of the request. F. Unless an elector specifies that the address to which an early ballot is to be sent is a temporary address, the recorder may use the information from an early ballot request form to update voter registration records. G. The county recorder or other officer in charge of early balloting shall provide an alphabetized list of all voters in the precinct who have requested and have been sent an early ballot to the election board of the precinct in which the voter is registered not later than the day before the election. H. As a result of experiencing an emergency between 7:00 p.m. on the Friday preceding the election and 5:00 p.m. on the Monday preceding the election, qualified electors may request to vote in the manner prescribed by the board of supervisors of their respective county. Before voting pursuant to this subsection, an elector who experiences an emergency shall provide identification as prescribed in section 16-579 and shall sign a statement under penalty of perjury that states that the person is experiencing or experienced an emergency after 7:00 p.m. on the Friday immediately preceding the election and before 5:00 p.m. on the Monday immediately preceding the election that would prevent the person from voting at the polls.  Signed statements received pursuant to this subsection are not subject to inspection pursuant to title 39, chapter 1, article 2.  For the purposes of this subsection, "emergency" means any unforeseen circumstances that would prevent the elector from voting at the polls. I. Notwithstanding section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 2, for any voting pursuant to subsection H of this section, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections may allow a qualified elector to update the elector's voter registration information as provided for in the secretary of state's instructions and procedures manual adopted pursuant to section 16-452. J. H. A candidate, political committee or other organization may distribute early ballot request forms to voters. If the early ballot request forms include a printed address for return, the addressee shall be the political subdivision that will conduct the election.  Failure to use the political subdivision as the return addressee is punishable by a civil penalty of up to three times the cost of the production and distribution of the request. K. I. All original and completed early ballot request forms that are received by a candidate, political committee or other organization shall be submitted within six business days after receipt by a candidate, political committee or other organization or eleven days before the election day, whichever is earlier, to the political subdivision that will conduct the election. Any person, political committee or other organization that fails to submit a completed early ballot request form within the prescribed time is subject to a civil penalty of up to $25 per day for each completed form withheld from submittal. Any person who knowingly fails to submit a completed early ballot request form before the submission deadline for the election immediately following the completion of the form is guilty of a class 6 felony. L. J. Except for a voter who is on the active permanent early voting list prescribed by section 16-544, a voter who requests a onetime early ballot pursuant to this section or for an election conducted pursuant to section 16-409 or article 8.1 of this chapter, a county recorder, city or town clerk or other election officer may not deliver or mail an early ballot to a person who has not requested an early ballot for that election.  An election officer who knowingly violates this subsection is guilty of a class 5 felony. END_STATUTE Sec. 11. Section 16-544, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-544. Permanent early voting list; civil penalty; violation; classification; definition A. Any voter may request to be included on a list of voters to receive an early ballot by mail for any election for which the county voter registration roll is used to prepare the election register. The county recorder of each county shall maintain the active permanent early voting list as part of the voter registration roll. B. In order to be included on the active permanent early voting list, the voter shall make a written request specifically requesting that the voter's name be added to the active permanent early voting list for all elections in which the applicant is eligible to vote. An A permanent early voter request form shall conform to requirements prescribed in the instructions and procedures manual issued pursuant to section 16-452. The application shall allow for the voter to provide the voter's name, residence address, mailing address in the voter's county of residence, date of birth and signature and shall state that the voter is attesting that the voter is a registered voter who is eligible to vote in the county of residence. The voter shall not list a mailing address that is outside of this state for the purpose of the active permanent early voting list unless the voter is an absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter as defined in the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act (P.L. 99-410; 52 United States Code section 20310). In lieu of the application, the applicant may submit a written request that contains the required information. C. On receipt of a request to be included on the active permanent early voting list, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall compare the signature on the request form with the voter's signature on the voter's registration form and, if the request is from the voter, shall mark the voter's registration file as an active a permanent early ballot request. D. Not less than ninety days before any polling place voting location election scheduled in March or August, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall mail to all voters who are eligible for the election, who are not listed as inactive and who are included on the active permanent early voting list an election notice by nonforwardable mail that is marked with the statement required by the postmaster to receive an address correction notification. If an election is not formally called by a jurisdiction by the one hundred eightieth day before the election, the recorder or other officer in charge of elections is not required to send the election notice. The notice shall include the dates of the elections that are the subject of the notice, the dates that the voter's ballot is expected to be mailed and the address where the ballot will be mailed. If the upcoming election is a partisan open primary election and the voter is not registered as a member of one of the political parties that is recognized for purposes of that primary, the notice shall include information on the procedure for the voter to designate a political party ballot. The notice shall be delivered with return postage prepaid and shall also include a means for the voter to do any of the following: 1. Change the mailing address for the voter's ballot to another location in the voter's county of residence. 2. Update the voter's residence address in the voter's county of residence. 3. Request that the voter not be sent a ballot for the upcoming election or elections indicated on the notice. E. If the notice that is mailed to the voter is returned undeliverable by the postal service, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall take the necessary steps to contact the voter at the voter's new residence address in order to update that voter's address or to move the voter to inactive status as prescribed in section 16-166, subsection A. If a voter is moved to inactive status, the voter shall be removed from the active permanent early voting list and may not receive an early ballot unless the voter updates or otherwise confirms the voter's registration information. If the voter is removed from the active permanent early voting list, the voter shall only be added to the active permanent early voting list again if the voter submits a new request pursuant to this section. F. Not later than the first day of early voting, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall mail an early ballot to all eligible voters who are not listed as inactive and who are included on the active permanent early voting list in the same manner prescribed in section 16-542, subsection C. If the voter has not returned the notice or otherwise notified the election officer within forty-five days before the election that the voter does not wish to receive an early ballot by mail for the election or elections indicated, the ballot shall automatically be scheduled for mailing. G. If a voter who is on the active permanent early voting list is not registered as a member of a recognized political party and fails to notify the county recorder of the voter's choice for political party ballot within forty-five days before a partisan open primary election, the following apply: 1. The voter shall not automatically be sent a ballot for that partisan open primary election only and the voter's name shall remain on the active permanent early voting list for future elections. 2. To receive an early ballot for the primary election, the voter shall submit the voter's choice for political party ballot to the county recorder. H. After a voter has requested to be included on the active permanent early voting list, the voter shall be sent an early ballot by mail automatically for any election at which a voter at that residence address is eligible to vote until any of the following occurs: 1. The voter requests in writing to be removed from the active permanent early voting list. 2. The voter's registration or eligibility for registration is moved to inactive status or canceled as otherwise provided by law. 3. The notice sent by the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections is returned undeliverable and the county recorder or officer in charge of elections is unable to contact the voter to determine the voter's continued desire to remain on the list. 4. The voter fails to vote an early ballot in all elections for two consecutive election cycles. For the purposes of this paragraph, "election" means any regular primary or regular general election for which there was a federal race on the ballot or for which a city or town candidate primary or first election or city or town candidate second, general or runoff election was on the ballot. This paragraph does not apply to: (a) A special taxing district that is authorized pursuant to section 16-191 to conduct its own elections. (b) A special district mail ballot election that is conducted pursuant to article 8.1 of this chapter. I. A voter may make a written request at any time to be removed from the active permanent early voting list. The request shall include the voter's name, residence address, date of birth and signature. On receipt of a completed request to remove a voter from the active permanent early voting list, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall remove the voter's name from the list as soon as practicable. J. An absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter as defined in the uniformed and overseas citizens absentee voting act (P.L. 99-410; 52 United States Code section 20310) is eligible to be placed on the active permanent early voting list pursuant to this section. K. A voter's failure to vote an early ballot once received does not constitute grounds to remove the voter from the active permanent early voting list, except that a county recorder shall remove a voter from the active early voting list if both of the following apply: 1. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections complies with subsection M of this section. 2. The voter fails to vote using an early ballot in all of the following elections for two consecutive election cycles: (a) A regular primary and regular general election for which there was a federal race on the ballot. (b) A city or town candidate primary or first election and a city or town candidate second, general or runoff election. L. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall send a notice to each voter who is on the active early voting list and who did not vote an early ballot in all elections for two consecutive election cycles as prescribed by subsection K of this section.  If the voter has provided the voter's telephone or mobile phone number or email address to the county recorder, the county recorder may additionally provide the notice to the voter by telephone call, text message or email.  The notice shall inform the voter that if the voter wishes to remain on the active early voting list, the voter shall do both of the following with the notice received: 1. Confirm in writing the voter's desire to remain on the active early voting list. 2. Return the completed notice to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections within ninety days after the notice is sent to the voter.  The notice shall be signed by the voter and shall contain the voter's address and date of birth. M. If a voter receives a notice as prescribed by subsection L of this section and the voter fails to respond within the ninety-day period, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall remove the voter's name from the active early voting list. N. L. A candidate, political committee or other organization may distribute active permanent early voting list request forms to voters. If the active permanent early voting list request forms include a printed address for return, that address shall be the political subdivision that will conduct the election. Failure to use the political subdivision as the return addressee is punishable by a civil penalty of up to three times the cost of the production and distribution of the active permanent early voting list request. O. M. All original and completed active permanent early voting list request forms that are received by a candidate, political committee or other organization shall be submitted within six business days after receipt by a candidate or political committee or eleven days before the election day, whichever is earlier, to the political subdivision that will conduct the election. Any person, political committee or other organization that fails to submit a completed active permanent early voting list request form within the prescribed time is subject to a civil penalty of up to $25 per day for each completed form withheld from submittal. Any person who knowingly fails to submit a completed active permanent early voting list request form before the submission deadline for the election immediately following the completion of the form is guilty of a class 6 felony. P. N. A person who receives an early ballot at an address at which another person formerly resided, without voting the ballot or signing the envelope, shall write "not at this address" on the envelope and place the mail piece in a United States postal service collection box or other mail receptacle. On receipt the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall proceed in the manner prescribed in subsection E of this section. Q. O. When the county recorder receives confirmation from another county that a person registered has registered to vote in that other county, the county recorder shall remove that person from the active permanent early voting list. R. P. If the county recorder receives credible information that a person has registered to vote in a different county, the county recorder shall confirm the person's voter registration with that other county and, on confirmation, shall remove that person from the county's active permanent early voting list pursuant to subsection Q  O of this section. S. For the purposes of this section, "election cycle" means the two-year period beginning on January 1 in the year after a statewide general election or, for cities and towns, the two-year period beginning on the first day of the calendar quarter after the calendar quarter in which the city's or town's second, runoff or general election is scheduled and ending on the last day of the calendar quarter in which the city's or town's immediately following second, runoff or general election is scheduled, however that election is designated by the city or town.END_STATUTE Sec. 12. Section 16-550, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-550. Receipt of voter's ballot; cure period; notice to cure system; tracking system A. Except for early ballots tabulated as prescribed in section 16-579.02 or, beginning in 2026, received at a voting location after a voter's identification is confirmed as prescribed by section 16-579, subsection A, paragraph 4, on receipt of the envelope containing the early ballot and the mail affidavit, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall compare the signature on the envelope with the signature of the elector on the elector's registration record as prescribed by section 16-550.01. If the signature is inconsistent with the elector's signature on the elector's registration record, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall make reasonable efforts to contact the voter, advise the voter of the inconsistent signature and allow the voter to correct or the county to confirm the inconsistent signature. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall allow signatures to be corrected not later than the fifth business day after a primary, general or special election that includes a federal office or the third business day after any other election. If the election is a primary, general or special election that includes a federal office and there are outstanding ballots that require identification or ballot signatures to be corrected or confirmed, in addition to the office's regular business hours, the county recorder's and any city or town clerks' offices that have an agreement with a county to be used as locations at which a voter may submit proof of identification shall be open during regular business hours to allow for curing signatures during the Friday and weekend before and the Friday and weekend after the election.  Regular business hours include at a minimum 8:00 a.m. until 5:00 p.m. If there are no ballots remaining that require identification or signatures to be cured, the county recorder and city and town clerks are not required to be open during the weekend. If the signature is missing, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall make reasonable efforts to contact the elector, advise the elector of the missing signature and allow the elector to add the elector's signature not later than 7:00 p.m. on election day. If satisfied that the signatures correspond, the recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall hold the envelope containing the early ballot and the completed mail affidavit unopened in accordance with the rules of the secretary of state.  Signatures that cannot be verified pursuant to section 16-550.01 or cured pursuant to this section shall be rejected. If the ballot is a conditional provisional ballot, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall make reasonable efforts to contact the voter and advise the voter that the voter shall must provide proof of identification to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections not later than the fifth business day after a primary, general or special election that includes a federal office or the third business day after any other election. Beginning with the first missing or mismatched signature that is identified after the period of early voting begins through the Monday immediately preceding the election, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall submit daily to the political parties that are qualified for continued representation on the state ballot an updated list of all voters whose signatures are missing or inconsistent with the voter's signature on the voter's registration record. Beginning on the Wednesday immediately following the election through the end of the signature cure period after a primary, general or special election that includes a federal office, or the third business day after the election for any other election, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall submit daily to the political parties that are qualified for continued representation on the state ballot an updated list of all voters whose signatures are inconsistent with the voter's signature on the voter's registration record and all voters who voted with a conditional provisional ballot.  This list of voters whose signatures require curing shall include for those voters all voter information that is provided to the political parties that are qualified for continued representation on the state ballot as prescribed by section 16-168. B. A county recorder or other officer in charge of elections who is required by subsection A of this section to make efforts to notify a voter that the voter's signature appears inconsistent or is missing or that the voter of a conditional provisional ballot is required to provide proof of identification shall establish a notice to cure system that indicates by text message to a voter whether the voter's signature needs to be added, confirmed or cured and whether the voter is required to provide identification or other information in order to validate the voter's ballot and whether the ballot has been verified and sent to be tabulated or rejected.  The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide voters with access to the notice to cure system on the county's website and shall require the voter's consent to receive text messages. B. C. The recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall thereafter safely keep the mail affidavits and early ballots in the recorder's or other officer's office and may deliver them for tallying pursuant to section 16-551. C. D. Processing and tabulation of individual ballots may begin immediately after the envelope and completed mail affidavit are processed pursuant to this section and delivered to the early election board and shall continue without delay until completed.  Until election day, the early election board and the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall: 1. Not access an aggregated complete results file of early voting and vote by mail ballots that were processed and tabulated by the end of the early voting period. 2. Not produce for internal or external use an aggregated results report or associated files of complete results. 3. Only produce a partial results report or associated files if it is part of the internal preparation for the hand count pursuant to section 16-602 or for the logic and accuracy testing required pursuant to section 16-449. 4. Not publicly release complete or partial results, whether for internal or external use, until all precincts have reported or one hour after the closing of the polls on election day, whichever is earlier. D. E. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall post on its website within forty-eight hours after all ballot tabulation is complete all system log files and other similar files from the election management system that verify compliance with subsection C  d of this section. E. F. The county recorder shall send a list of all voters who were issued early ballots to the election board of the precinct in which the voter is registered. F. G. For a county that uses early ballots, the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide an early ballot tracking system that indicates by text message to an early voter whether the voter's early ballot has been received and whether the early ballot has been verified and sent to be tabulated or rejected.  The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide voters with access to the early ballot tracking system on the county's website and shall require the early voter's consent to receive text messages. H. If a county recorder or other officer in charge of elections receives a voted early ballot that appears to be an otherwise lawful ballot that has been issued by a county or JURISDICTION other than the county that received the ballot, the following apply: 1. If the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections that initially received the early ballot received it on or before 7:00 p.m. on election day, that county recorder or other officer in charge of elections shall provide the ballot and the mail affidavit by personal delivery, expedited mail or other package transfer method to the county recorder or other officer in charge of elections from the county that issued the ballot. 2. The county recorder or other officer in charge of elections that initially received the early ballot shall make the DELIVERY or transfer PRESCRIBED by paragraph 1 of this subsection so that the second county recorder or other officer in charge of elections receives the early ballot and mail affidavit within three days after election day. 3. On receipt as prescribed by paragraph 2 of this subsection, the county or other jurisdiction that issued and received the ballot and mail affidavit shall process the early ballot as prescribed by subsections A through F of this section and section 16-550.01, and that ballot is eligible to be considered for tabulation. G. I. This section does not apply to: 1. A special taxing district that is authorized pursuant to section 16-191 to conduct its own elections. 2. A special district mail ballot election that is conducted pursuant to article 8.1 of this chapter. END_STATUTE Sec. 13. Section 16-572, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-572. Delivery and custody of ballots at voting center A. On opening the polls, the inspector shall produce the sealed package of official ballots and publicly open it and deliver one book or block of ballots therein contained to the judges. The other blocks or books of ballots, if any, shall be retained by the inspector until called for by the judges and required for voting. B. One of the judges of election shall keep the ballots within the polling place voting center in plain view of the public and deliver them only to qualified voters. C. A person shall not take or remove a ballot from the polling place a voting location or a designated ballot receptacle before the polls are closed, EXCEPT THAT EARLY BALLOTS THAT ARE RETURNED AT VOTING LOCATIONS or at a designated ballot receptacle MAY BE REMOVED BY TWO AUTHORIZED ELECTION WORKERS WHO MUST EACH BE A MEMBER OF A DIFFERENT ONE OF THE TWO LARGEST POLITICAL PARTIES, WHO HAVE COMPLETED A CHAIN OF CUSTODY LOG MAINTAINED AT THE VOTING LOCATION or designated ballot receptacle THAT INCLUDES THE TOTAL COUNT OF THE EARLY BALLOTS BEING TRANSPORTED AND WHO DELIVER THE BALLOTS TO A DESIGNATED RECEIVING SITE THAT IS AN OFFICIAL ELECTIONS FACILITY AND NOT A THIRD-PARTY VENDOR. THE CHAIN OF CUSTODY LOG FOR EARLY BALLOTS RETURNED AT VOTING LOCATIONS and designated ballot receptacles SHALL BE AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY THE PUBLIC, THE POLITICAL PARTIES, the COMMITTEES REPRESENTING ANY BALLOT MEASURES ON THE BALLOT AND THE CANDIDATES ON THE BALLOT WITHIN FORTY-EIGHT HOURS AFTER ELECTION DAY. END_STATUTE Sec. 14. Section 16-1017, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-1017. Unlawful acts by voters with respect to voting; classification A voter who knowingly commits any of the following acts is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor: 1. Makes a false statement as to the voter's inability to mark a ballot. 2. Interferes with a voter within the seventy-five foot limit of the polling place a voting center as posted by the election marshal, within the seventy-five foot limit of a designated ballot receptacle or within seventy-five feet of the main outside entrance to an on-site early voting location established by a county recorder pursuant to section 16-542, subsection A. 3. Endeavors while within the seventy-five foot limit for a polling place voting center, designated ballot receptacle or on-site early voting location to induce a voter to vote for or against a particular candidate or issue. 4. Prior to Before the close of an election defaces or destroys a sample ballot posted by election officers,  or defaces, tears down, removes or destroys a card of instructions posted for the instruction of voters. 5. Removes or destroys supplies or conveniences furnished to enable a voter to prepare the voter's ballot. 6. Hinders the voting of others. 7. Votes in a county in which the voter no longer resides, except as provided in section 16-125. END_STATUTE Sec. 15. Section 16-1018, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-1018. Additional unlawful acts by persons with respect to voting; classification A person who commits any of the following acts is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor: 1. Knowingly electioneers on election day within a polling place voting location or within the SEVENTY-five foot limit for a designated ballot receptacle or in a public manner within seventy-five feet of the main outside entrance of a polling place voting center or on-site early voting location established by a county recorder pursuant to section 16-542, subsection A. 2. Intentionally disables or removes from the polling place voting center, on-site early voting location or custody of an election official a voting machine or a voting record. 3. Knowingly removes an official ballot from a polling place voting location, on-site early voting location or designated ballot RECEPTACLE before closing the polls. 4. Shows another voter's ballot to any person after it is prepared for voting in such a manner as to reveal the contents, except to an authorized person lawfully assisting the voter.  A voter who makes available an image of the voter's own ballot by posting on the internet or in some other electronic medium is deemed to have consented to retransmittal of that image and that retransmittal does not constitute a violation of this section. 5. Knowingly solicits a voter to show the voter's ballot, or receives from a voter a ballot prepared for voting, unless the person is an election official or unless otherwise authorized by law. 6. Knowingly receives an official ballot from a person other than an election official having charge of the ballots. 7. Knowingly delivers an official ballot to a voter, unless the voter is an election official. 8. Except for a completed ballot transmitted by an elector by fax or other electronic format pursuant to section 16-543, knowingly places a mark on the voter's ballot by which it can be identified as the one voted by the voter. 9. After having received a ballot as a voter, knowingly fails to return the ballot to the election official before leaving the polling place voting location or on-site early voting location. 10. KNOWINGLY INTERFERES WITH A VOTER OR KNOWINGLY ENGAGES IN CONDUCT THAT IS DIRECTED AT ONE OR MORE PERSONS WHO ARE DELIVERING OR ATTEMPTING TO DELIVER A VOTED BALLOT TO A LAWFUL RECIPIENT, a voting location OR a designated ballot RECEPTACLE AND THAT CONSTITUTES HARASSMENT AS PRESCRIBED IN SECTION 13-2921.END_STATUTE Sec. 16. Appropriations; secretary of state; elections; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the secretary of state for: 1. Grants to assist counties to purchase equipment needed to convert to the use of voting centers. At least $500,000 shall be used for this purpose. 2. Participation in a multistate electronic voter registration information center. 3. Assistance for counties in establishing text-based early voting tracking systems and a text-based notice to cure system. B. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the secretary of state for information technology and cybersecurity programs that support state and county elections. C. The appropriations made in subsections A and B of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. Sec. 17. Short title This act may be cited as the "Voters First Act".